Wyoming, session 2026, HB0157.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-125 is created to read:

1-39-125. Liability; protection of parental rights.

A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from
a violation of W.S. 14-2-206.
HB0157

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0388

Section 2. W.S. 1-39-104(a), 1-39-113(a)(intro),
1-39-118(d) and 14-2-206 by creating a new subsection (d)
are amended to read:

1-39-104. Granting immunity from tort liability;
liability on contracts; exceptions.

(a) A governmental entity and its public employees
while acting within the scope of duties are granted
immunity from liability for any tort except as provided by
W.S. 1-39-105 through 1-39-112 and 1-39-122 through
1-39-124 1-39-125. Any immunity in actions based on a
contract entered into by a governmental entity is waived
except to the extent provided by the contract if the
contract was within the powers granted to the entity and
was properly executed and except as provided in W.S.
1-39-120(b). The claims procedures of W.S. 1-39-113 apply
to contractual claims against governmental entities.

1-39-113. Claims procedure.

HB0157

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0388
(a) Except as provided by W.S. 14-2-206(d), no action
shall be brought under this act against a governmental
entity unless the claim upon which the action is based is
presented to the entity as an itemized statement in writing
within two (2) years of the date of the alleged act, error
or omission, except that a cause of action may be
instituted not more than two (2) years after discovery of
the alleged act, error or omission, if the claimant can
establish that the alleged act, error or omission was:

1-39-118. Maximum liability; insurance authorized.

(d) Except as provided by W.S. 14-2-206(d), no
judgment against a governmental entity shall include an
award for exemplary or punitive damages, for interest prior
to judgments or for attorney's fees.

14-2-206. Protection of parental rights;
applicability; cause of action.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of the
Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, if the state or any agency
or political subdivision of the state infringes upon the
HB0157

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0388
parental rights of a parent under this section, the parent
shall have grounds for a civil cause of action against the
state, agency or political subdivision for declaratory and
injunctive relief. An action under this subsection shall
not be subject to the requirements of W.S. 1-39-113. A
district court shall award reasonable attorney fees and
costs to a prevailing parent.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0157